Illinois, session 104th, HB3308.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wrongs to Children Act is amended by 5changing Sections 1 and 5 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 150/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2351)7    Sec. 1. Prohibited activities involving children. 8    (a) It shall be unlawful for any person having the care, 9custody or control of any child under the age of fourteen 10years, to exhibit, use or employ, or in any manner, or under 11any pretense, sell, apprentice, give away, let out, or 12otherwise dispose of any such child to any person in or for the 13vocation or occupation, service or purpose of singing, playing 14on musical instruments, rope or wire walking, dancing, 15begging, or peddling, or as a gymnast, contortionist, rider or 16acrobat in any place whatsoever, or for any obscene, indecent 17or immoral purpose, exhibition or practice whatsoever, or for, 18or in any business, exhibition or vocation injurious to the 19health or dangerous to the life or limb of such child, or 20cause, procure or encourage any such child to engage therein. 21Nothing in this section contained shall apply to or affect the 22employment or use of any such child as a singer or musician in 23any church, school or academy (or at any respectable   HB3308- 2 -LRB104 10020 RLC 20091 b1entertainment), or the teaching or learning the science or 2practice of music.3    (b) It is unlawful for a child under 18 years of age to 4engage in panhandling. As used in this subsection (b), 5"panhandling" means the selling of food products or other 6items; or begging for money or asking for monetary donations 7unless the child is representing a nonprofit organization. 8"Panhandling" does not include a solicitation of money or a 9gratuity for:10        (1) a religious organization such as a church, 11    synagogue, mosque, temple, or other organized religion;12        (2) a recognized charity or organization that is 13    exempt from full or partial taxation under Section 501 of 14    the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or15        (3) a friend or family member either in person or 16    through the Internet. 17(Source: Laws 1877, p. 90.) 18    (720 ILCS 150/5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2355)19    Sec. 5. Any person convicted under the provisions of the 20preceding Sections sections, shall for the first offense be 21guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; and for a second or any 22subsequent offense shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony. Any 23person under 18 years of age who engages in panhandling is 24guilty of a petty offense. 25(Source: P.A. 77-2346.)